Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.050

Creation of district—Public hearing—Amendments to original plan.

The county legislative authority shall hold a public hearing on the proposed lake or beach management district at the date, time, and place designated in the resolution of intention.

At this hearing the county legislative authority shall hear objections from any person affected by the formation of the lake or beach management district. Representatives of the departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and ecology shall be afforded opportunities to make presentations on and comment on the proposal. Members of the public shall be afforded an opportunity to comment on the proposal. The county legislative authority must consider recommendations provided to it by the departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and ecology. The public hearing may be extended to other times and dates declared at the public hearing. The county legislative authority may make such changes in the boundaries of the lake or beach management district or such modification in plans for the proposed lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities as it deems necessary. The county legislative authority may not change boundaries of the lake or beach management district to include property that was not included previously without first passing an amended resolution of intention and giving new notice to the owners or reputed owners of property newly included in the proposed lake or beach management district in the manner and form and within the time provided for the original notice. The county legislative authority shall not alter the plans for the proposed lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities to result in an increase in the amount of money proposed to be raised, and shall not increase the amount of money proposed to be raised, without first passing an amended resolution of intention and giving new notice to property owners in the manner and form and within the time provided for the original notice.

[ 2008 c 301 s 7; 1994 c 264 s 10; 1988 c 36 s 10; 1985 c 398 s 5.]